Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 1. Appeal and Bill of Exceptions

Law reviews. —

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

For article, “The Relationship of Double Jeopardy to Prosecution Appeals,” see 73 Notre Dame L. Rev. 1 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

4 Am. Jur. 2d Appeal and Error § 1 et seq.

24 C.J.S. Criminal Law §§ 1660 to 1723.

§ 7-12-101.
Manner of appeal.

A defendant may appeal his conviction in any criminal case in the manner provided by the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 145; R.S. 1887, § 3306; Laws 1890, ch. 73, § 138; R.S. 1899, § 5377; C.S. 1910, § 6241; C.S. 1920, § 7538; R.S. 1931, § 33-908; C.S. 1945, § 10-1307; W.S. 1957, § 7-287; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 2010, ch. 69, § 207.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted “and the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure for Courts of Limited Jurisdiction” at the end.

Cited

in

State v. Newman, 2004 WY 41, 88 P.3d 445,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(2004).

Cross references. —

The Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure for Courts of Limited Jurisdiction have been superseded by the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure. For Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure, see the

Wyoming Court Rules Annotated.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Effect of escape by, or fugitive status of, state criminal defendant on availability of appeal or other post-verdict or post-conviction relief — State cases, 105 ALR5th 529.

§ 7-12-102.
Right of district attorney to take exceptions; certification; rules.

The district attorney may take exceptions to any opinion or decision of the court made during the prosecution of a criminal case. Before being filed in the supreme court, the bill of exceptions shall be presented to the trial court which shall certify whether the contents of the bill are correct. If certified, the trial court shall sign the bill containing the exceptions and affix the seal of the court and the bill shall be made part of the record. The bill of exceptions shall be governed by rules as shall be promulgated by the Wyoming supreme court.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 146; R.S. 1887, § 3307; R.S. 1899, § 5378; C.S. 1910, § 6242; C.S. 1920, § 7539; R.S. 1931, § 33-909; C.S. 1945, § 10-1308; W.S. 1957, § 7-288; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1985, ch. 147, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to procedure for making exceptions and objections, see Rules 30 and 47, W.R. Cr. P.

Prosecuting attorney may take exceptions. —

Under Wyoming statutes prosecuting attorney may take exceptions to any opinion or decision of the court, during prosecution of the cause, which he may think erroneous. Territory v. Nelson, 2 Wyo. 346,

1880 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1880).

But proper bill of exceptions necessary for review. —

Where a ruling was sought to be reviewed by the state on a bill of exceptions, but bill was defective, ruling could not be reviewed without a proper bill of exceptions. State ex rel. Gibson v. Cornwell, 14 Wyo. 526, 85 P. 977,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1906).

Statutes must be complied with. —

It is only upon compliance with provisions of this section and §§

7-12-103

and

7-12-104

that supreme court obtains jurisdiction to review any ruling of the district court adverse to the state in criminal prosecutions. State v. Ginther, 53 Wyo. 17, 77 P.2d 803,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1938).

A bill of exceptions is only way by which state may challenge

and have reviewed any adverse ruling of the district court in criminal prosecutions. State v. Heberling, 553 P.2d 1043,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 1976).

A bill of exceptions is the exclusive means for the prosecution to seek review of an adverse ruling made during a trial. State v. Selig, 635 P.2d 786,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo. 1981).

Irregularity in date of bill. —

The fact that a bill of exceptions is not dated back to a date during the trial or filed nunc pro tunc as of a date during the trial is at most an irregularity. State v. Selig, 635 P.2d 786,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo. 1981).

Direct appeal by state dismissed. —

Even if the requirement of adherence to procedural steps outlined in these provisions were relaxed, where the state did not purport to act under the provisions of these sections but brought a direct appeal and insisted that an order of the trial court dismissing the defendant should be reversed and the cause remanded, the appeal was dismissed. State v. Benales, 365 P.2d 811,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1961).

Prosecuting attorney may not appeal. —

The legislature has not authorized the state to appeal in a criminal case, and a cross-appeal is in effect the same as an appeal. Crozier v. State, 882 P.2d 1230,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1994), limited, State v. Newman, 2004 WY 41, 88 P.3d 445,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 2004).

Unsealed bill of exceptions prepared under this section wasfatally defective. —

State ex rel. Gibson v. Cornwell, 14 Wyo. 526, 85 P. 977,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1906).

All evidence must be in bill to weigh its sufficiency. —

To determine upon prosecuting attorney's exceptions in criminal case whether there was error in directing verdict of not guilty, where ground of exception was that evidence was sufficient to convict, it is necessary to examine, and for bill of exceptions to contain, all evidence given upon trial. State v. Snearly, 18 Wyo. 341, 107 P. 389,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1910).

Evidence presumed to authorize instruction. —

Upon exceptions of prosecuting attorney to refusal of his requested instructions, where evidence is not in record, but court instructed on its own motion upon question involved, it may be assumed that there was evidence authorizing instruction upon the point. State v. Pressler, 16 Wyo. 214, 92 P. 806,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1907).

Applied

in

Middleton v. State, 34 Wyo. 102, 241 P. 715,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(1925);
Koppala v. State, 15 Wyo. 398, 89 P. 576,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1907);
Seng v. State, 20 Wyo. 222, 122 P. 631,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(1912);
State v. Snearly, 18 Wyo. 341, 107 P. 389,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(1910);
Boulter v. State, 6 Wyo. 66, 42 P. 606,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(1895);
White v. State, 23 Wyo. 130, 147 P. 171,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1915);
Morgan v. State, 26 Wyo. 212, 181 P. 598,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1919);
Bird v. State, 34 Wyo. 112, 241 P. 701,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(1925);
Claussen v. State, 21 Wyo. 505, 133 P. 1055,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(1913);
Ross v. State, 16 Wyo. 285, 93 P. 299,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1908);
Vines v. State, 19 Wyo. 255, 116 P. 1013,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1911);
State ex rel. Gibson v. Cornwell, 14 Wyo. 526, 85 P. 977,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(1906);
Richardson v. State, 15 Wyo. 465, 89 P. 1027,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1907);
Hyde v. State, 22 Wyo. 271, 138 P. 550,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1914);
Delmont v. State, 15 Wyo. 271, 88 P. 623,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1907);
Patrick v. State, 17 Wyo. 260, 98 P. 588,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1908);
State v. Gallegos, 384 P.2d 967,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1963);
State v. Clark, 392 P.2d 539,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1964);
State v. Reisch, 491 P.2d 1254,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 274

(Wyo. 1971);
Moss v. State, 492 P.2d 1329,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 220

(Wyo. 1972);
City of Laramie v. Mengel, 671 P.2d 340,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo. 1983);
Ken v. State, 2011 WY 167, 267 P.3d 567,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Dec. 22, 2011).

Quoted

in

State v. Steele, 620 P.2d 1026,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 329

(Wyo. 1980); Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990).

Stated

in

State v. Laude, 654 P.2d 1223,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1982); State v. Carter, 714 P.2d 1217,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 487

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

State v. Thompson, 15 Wyo. 136, 87 P. 433,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1906); State v. Weeden, 17 Wyo. 418, 100 P. 114,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1909); State v. Peterson, 27 Wyo. 185, 194 P. 342,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 33

, 13 A.L.R. 1284 (1920); State v. Hall, 27 Wyo. 224, 194 P. 476,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1921); State v. Butler, 40 Wyo. 404, 278 P. 563,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(1929); State v. Rideout, 450 P.2d 452,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1969); State v. Moss, 471 P.2d 333,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1970); In re Jones, 500 P.2d 690,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 298

(Wyo. 1972); State v. Stern, 526 P.2d 344,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 231

(Wyo. 1974); State v. Chastain, 594 P.2d 458,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1979); Parkhurst v. Shillinger, 128 F.3d 1366,

1997 U.S. App. LEXIS 29095

(10th Cir. 1997); State v. Newman, 2004 WY 41, 88 P.3d 445,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

§ 7-12-103.
Filing of bill by attorney general in supreme court.

Following certification of a bill of exceptions by the trial court as provided by W.S.

7-12-102

, the attorney general may apply to the supreme court for permission to file the bill for review and decision upon the points presented. If the supreme court allows the bill to be filed, the judge who presided at the trial in which the bill was taken shall appoint a competent attorney to argue the case against the state and shall fix a reasonable fee for his service to be paid out of the treasury of the county in which the bill was taken.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 147; R.S. 1887, § 3308; R.S. 1899, § 5379; C.S. 1910, § 6243; C.S. 1920, § 7540; R.S. 1931, § 33-910; C.S. 1945, § 10-1309; W.S. 1957, § 7-289; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1985, ch. 147, § 2.

Statutes provide only method of review for state. —

The state is afforded no method of review of adverse ruling in criminal case, except through statutes providing for specialized procedure on exceptions by prosecuting attorney. State v. Ginther, 53 Wyo. 17, 77 P.2d 803,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1938).

A bill of exceptions is the only way by which the state may challenge and have reviewed any adverse ruling of the district court in criminal prosecutions. State v. Heberling, 553 P.2d 1043,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 1976).

And do not apply to violation of ordinance. —

These provisions apply only to the trial of criminal cases wherein accused is charged with an offense against the laws of the state and not to a prosecution in a municipal court for the violation of an ordinance. City of Sheridan v. Cadle, 24 Wyo. 293, 157 P. 892,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1916).

Applied

in

Ken v. State, 2011 WY 167, 267 P.3d 567,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Dec. 22, 2011).

Stated

in

State v. Laude, 654 P.2d 1223,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1982); State v. Carter, 714 P.2d 1217,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 487

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Gibson v. Cornwell, 14 Wyo. 526, 85 P. 977,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(1906); State v. Thompson, 15 Wyo. 136, 87 P. 433,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1906); State v. Peterson, 27 Wyo. 185, 194 P. 342,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 33

, 13 A.L.R. 1284 (1920); State v. Hall, 27 Wyo. 224, 194 P. 476,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1921); State v. Butler, 40 Wyo. 404, 278 P. 563,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(1929); State v. Chastain, 594 P.2d 458,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1979); State v. Keffer, 860 P.2d 1118,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1993); State v. Newman, 2004 WY 41, 88 P.3d 445,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Exclusion or inclusion of terminal Sunday or holiday in computing time for taking or perfecting appellate review, 61 ALR2d 482.

§ 7-12-104.
Decision of supreme court upon bill.

If the bill of exceptions is allowed to be filed, the supreme court shall render a decision on each point presented.

The decision of the supreme court shall determine the law to govern in any similar case which may be pending at the time the decision is rendered, or which may afterwards arise in the state, but shall not reverse nor in any manner affect the judgment of the court in the case in which the bill of exceptions was taken.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 149; R.S. 1887, § 3310; R.S. 1899, § 5381; C.S. 1910, § 6245; C.S. 1920, § 7542; R.S. 1931, § 33-912; C.S. 1945, § 10-1311; W.S. 1957, § 7-291; W.S. 1977, § 7-12-105; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4.

Evidence presumed to authorize instruction. —

Upon exceptions of prosecuting attorney to refusal of his requested instructions, where evidence is not in record but court instructed on its own motion upon question involved, it may be assumed that there was evidence authorizing instruction upon the point. State v. Pressler, 16 Wyo. 214, 92 P. 806,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1907).

Applied

in

State v. Benales, 365 P.2d 811,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1961); Moss v. State, 492 P.2d 1329,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 220

(Wyo. 1972); State v. Steele, 620 P.2d 1026,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 329

(Wyo. 1980); State v. Selig, 635 P.2d 786,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo. 1981); Ken v. State, 2011 WY 167, 267 P.3d 567,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Dec. 22, 2011).

Quoted

in

State v. Heberling, 553 P.2d 1043,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 1976); Crozier v. State, 882 P.2d 1230,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Gibson v. Cornwell, 14 Wyo. 526, 85 P. 977,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(1906); City of Sheridan v. Cadle, 24 Wyo. 293, 157 P. 892,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(1916); State v. Peterson, 27 Wyo. 185, 194 P. 342,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 33

, 13 A.L.R. 1284 (1920); State v. Hall, 27 Wyo. 224, 194 P. 476,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1921); State v. Butler, 40 Wyo. 404, 278 P. 563,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(1929); State v. Ginther, 53 Wyo. 17, 77 P.2d 803,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(1938); State v. Rideout, 450 P.2d 452,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1969); State v. Moss, 471 P.2d 333,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1970); State v. Chastain, 594 P.2d 458,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1979); State v. Stahl, 838 P.2d 1193,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1992); State v. Keffer, 860 P.2d 1118,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1993); State v. Newman, 2004 WY 41, 88 P.3d 445,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — The State's Right to Appeal in Criminal Cases. State v. Heiner, 683 P.2d 629,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 284

(Wyo. 1984),” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 723 (1985).